Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB573.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Blood Donation Education.--(a) The Department of Education shall, in cooperation with the Department of Health:(1) Establish a unit of instruction to educate students in grades eleven and twelve regarding blood donation, emphasize the need for donated blood and encourage blood donation and participation in blood donation programs for students.(2) Develop and distribute appropriate educational materials and resources to educators and public and nonpublic schools.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) The unit of instruction required under subsection (a) shall be integrated within the health course of study required in accordance with the State Board of Education regulations contained in 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment). The Department of Education may utilize any appropriate public or private materials, personnel and other resources in developing and implementing this unit of instruction.(c) The unit of instruction required under subsection (a) shall include:(1) A physiology component relating to blood, blood types and the circulatory system.(2) A need and usage component that includes information relating to:(i) The frequency and types of situations where donated blood is needed.(ii) Procedures utilized for the collection of donated blood and the safety of those procedures.(iii) Procedures utilized for the storage of donated blood and the various uses of donated blood.(iv) Specific instances where an available donated blood supply assisted individuals in need.(3) A participation component to encourage students to donate blood and volunteer at local blood banks, which component emphasizes the personal rewards and community benefits from donation and participation.(d) (1) A student shall be excused from participation in the unit of instruction required under subsection (a) if the student or, if the student is under eighteen (18) years of age, the student's parent or guardian objects in writing to 20250SB0573PN0583 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participation on religious grounds.(2) No student excused under paragraph (1) may be penalized for the excuse. During the time period that the unit of instruction is presented, a substitute unit of instruction shall be provided to the student in accordance with regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education.(e) The State Board of Education shall promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0573PN0583 - 3 - 123456789